Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.935

Construction of chapter—Certain agreements subject to RCW 28A.150.410, 28A.400.200, and 28A.150.276.

Nothing in this chapter grants employers or employees the right to reach agreements regarding salary or compensation increases for the state's statutory program of basic education in excess of those authorized in accordance with RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200. School districts are authorized to reach agreements regarding salaries or compensation for enrichment activities subject to RCW 28A.400.200 and 28A.150.276.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 706; 1990 c 33 s 571; (1997 c 431 s 22 expired June 30, 1999); 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 206; 1981 c 16 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.

Severability—1981 c 16: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 16 s 5.]